District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.29d

Trade dress requirements for private vehicles-for-hire.

A private vehicle-for-hire shall display a consistent and distinctive trade dress consisting of a logo, insignia, or emblem at all times while the operator is logged into the private vehicle-for-hire company’s digital dispatch. The trade dress shall be:

(1)

Sufficiently large and color contrasted so as to be readable during daylight hours at a distance of at least 50 feet; and

(2)

Reflective, illuminated, or otherwise patently visible in darkness.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20j-4
as added Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 2(k), 61 DCR 12430